Washington statutes.
RCW 33.24.345

Acquisition of control of association—Authorized.

A person or other entity, including an association, organized under the laws of this state or authorized to transact business in this state, may acquire any or all of the assets or shares of stock of any association authorized to transact business under this title.

[ 1982 c 3 s 52.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.